skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<pardef n="/i__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>iNi</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ini</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ini</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>INi</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Ini</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Ini</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>iNi</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ini</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ini</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>INi</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Ini</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>Ini</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>iNa</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ina</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ina</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iByAm</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iBiH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>iNe</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ine</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ine</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iByAm</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iByaH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>iNaH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iByAm</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iByaH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>iNaH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inaH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>iNoH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inoH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inoH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>INAm</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>InAm</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>InAm</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>iNi</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ini</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ini</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>iNoH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inoH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-qs-zA-QS-Z]*</re>
<p><l>inoH</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRu</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][aAiIuUqQeEoOhyvrkKgGfpPbBm]*</re>
<p><l>iNi</l><r>i<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*[rR][a-zA-Z]+[lcCjJFtTdDNwWxXnSs][a-zA-Z]*</re>

    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/i__nm"/></e>
